Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB936.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 402 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 402. Definitions.--As used in this article, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Child care" means the supervision of children who are younger than sixteen years of age and who are away from the home, which is provided in lieu of parental supervision for part of the twenty-four-hour day. The term does not include the supervision of children provided in a place of worship during 123456789101112131415161718 religious services or by a social service organization."Child-care center" means a premises, certified by the department, where child care is provided at any one time for seven or more children unrelated to the operator of the premises."Child-care employe " means a n individual who provides child care in a family child-care home or child-care center.* * *"Family child-care home " means a residence where child care is provided by the occupier of the residence to no less than four children and no more than six children at a time where none of the children are related to the occupier who provides the child care.* * *Section 2. Section 408.3(a) of the act is amended and subsection (c) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 408.3. Copayments for Subsidized Child Care.--(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or departmental regulation, the parent or caretaker of a child enrolled in subsidized child care shall pay a copayment for the subsidized child care based on a percentage of the family's annual income, or the status of the parent or caretaker of a child enrolled in subsidized child care as a child-care employe or as a direct support professional employed by a child-care center or family child-care home, as specified in a copayment schedule established by the department pursuant to this section.* * *(c) In establishing the copayment amounts pursuant to this section, all of the following shall apply:* * *20250HB0936PN1002 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3.3) A family in which the parent or caretaker is a child- care employe or a direct support professional employed by a child-care center or family child-care home shall be eligible for subsidized child care, regardless of the family's annual income according to the following:(i) The copayment for a family in which the parent or caretaker is a child-care employe or a direct support professional employed by a child-care center or family child-care home amount shall not exceed fifteen percent of the family's annual income.(ii) If a child-care employe or direct support professional employed by a child-care center or family child-care home qualifies for subsidized child care based on the percentage of the family's annual income, the copayment amount shall follow the guidelines for families which are eligible for subsidized child care based on income but which do not have a parent or caretaker who is a child-care employe or direct support professional employed by a child-care center or family child-care home.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0936PN1002 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021